Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.42, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Minnesota math corps program. (a) A Minnesota math corps program is established to deleted text begin givedeleted text end new text begin providenew text end ServeMinnesota AmeriCorps membersnew text begin withnew text end a data-based problem-solving model of mathematics instruction deleted text begin useful fordeleted text end new text begin to use innew text end providing elementary and middle school students and their teachers with instructional supportnew text begin . Minnesota math corps must use evidence-based instructional support to evaluate and accelerate student learning on foundational mathematics skills that enable studentsnew text end to meet state academic standards in mathematicsnew text begin and long-term proficiency expectations for the workforcenew text end . (b) The commission must submit a biennial report to the committees of the legislature with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education that records and evaluates program data to determine the efficacy of the programs under this subdivision. new text begin (c) For purposes of this subdivision, "evidence-based" means the instruction or curriculum is based on reliable, trustworthy, and valid evidence and has demonstrated a record of success in increasing student competency and proficiency in mathematics and numeracy. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MATH CORPS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Minnesota math corps. new text end new text begin (a) For the Minnesota math corps program under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.42, subdivision 9: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Any balance remaining in fiscal year 2026 is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end